Vermont, session 2025-2026, H504.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendments to the charter of the City
of Rutland as set forth in this act. Voters approved the proposals of
amendment on November 5, 2024 and March 4, 2025.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 9 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 9. CITY OF RUTLAND
* * *
§ 5.3. VIOLATION OF ORDINANCES
(a) The Board of Aldermen may provide penalties for the violation of any
ordinance, regulation, or bylaw. In no case shall the penalty exceed
imprisonment for one year or a fine of $500.00, or both, per violation the
maximum penalty allowed under 24 V.S.A. § 1974.
* * *
§ 8.5. ASSESSMENT OF TAXES
The Board of Aldermen shall annually, during the first twenty (20) 20 days
of July, assess upon the grand list of the City taxes sufficient to meet the
following requirement:
* * *
VT LEG #384192 v.1

No. M-5 Page 2 of 6
2025
(2) Taxes required for general City purposes, which shall not exceed
$.85 $0.85 upon the dollar of the grand list except if a larger sum has been
authorized by the legal voters of the City in a meeting warned for that purpose;
but the tax for general City purposes shall not include the tax annually assessed
on the grand list for the support of the schools in the City.
* * *
(5) Taxes required for the replacement for fire equipment, which shall
not exceed $.0175 $0.0225 on the dollar of the grand list, except if a larger
sum has been authorized by the legal voters of the City in a meeting warned for
that purpose.
(6) Taxes required for the municipal employees pension fund, which
shall not exceed $.06 $0.06 on the dollar of the grand list, except if a larger
sum has been authorized by the legal voters of the City in a meeting warned for
that purpose.
(7) Taxes required for the replacement of public works, police, and
recreation equipment, which shall not exceed $.012 $0.012 on the dollar of the
grand list, except if a larger sum has been authorized by the legal voters of the
City in a meeting warned for that purpose.
* * *
(10) Taxes required for the replacement of police equipment, which
shall not exceed $0.018 on the dollar of the grand list, except if a larger sum
VT LEG #384192 v.1

No. M-5 Page 3 of 6
2025
has been authorized by the legal voters of the City in a meeting warned for that
purpose.
* * *
§ 17.3. REQUISITIONS
(a) All purchases made under section 17.1 of this charter shall be made
upon written requisitions therefor upon the Purchasing Agent. The Purchasing
Agent shall immediately proceed to purchase under the provisions of the
ordinances the property so required and to distribute it accordingly taking a
receipt therefor upon the original requisition. The Purchasing Agent shall then
forward the requisition to the City Clerk. Purchases in excess of $3,000.00 the
amount identified in the City’s Purchasing Policy shall be awarded upon bids
as hereinafter set forth in this subchapter.
* * *
§ 36.5. BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS,; COMPOSITION
(a) The administration, management, and supervision of the Authority shall
be vested in a Board of Commissioners, except as provided otherwise herein.
The Board shall consist of nine members, all of whom shall be residents of the
City of Rutland for their respective terms of office. One member of the Board
shall be the City Treasurer, and one member will be appointed from the Board
of Aldermen for a one year term. The remaining seven members of the Board
shall be appointed by the Mayor with the approval of the Board of Aldermen
pursuant to the charter of the City of Rutland. All members appointed except
VT LEG #384192 v.1

No. M-5 Page 4 of 6
2025
for members appointed for creation of this Board shall serve for periods of
three years. Upon creation, three members shall be appointed for a term to
expire on April 1 of the third calendar year after appointment; two members
shall be appointed for a term to expire April 1 of the second calendar year after
appointment; and two members shall be appointed for a term to expire on April
1 of the first calendar year after appointment. All terms shall thereafter expire
on April 1 of the third calendar year following appointment. A person
appointed to fill an unexpired term shall serve to the end of that term. At the
creation of the Commission, the appointments may only be denied by a
majority vote of the Board of Aldermen and then thereafter, all appointments
will be made pursuant to the charter of the City:
(1) the City Treasurer;
(2) one member, appointed by the Board of Aldermen for a one-year
term;
(3) six members, who shall be residents of the City for their respective
terms of office, appointed by the Mayor with the approval of the Board of
Aldermen pursuant to this charter; and
(4) one member, who shall be a property owner within the City and a
resident of Rutland County, appointed by the Mayor with the approval of the
Board of Aldermen pursuant to this charter.
(b) Except for members appointed for the creation of the Board, members
shall serve for three-year terms.
VT LEG #384192 v.1

No. M-5 Page 5 of 6
2025
(c) Upon creation, three members shall be appointed for a term to expire on
April 1 of the third year after appointment, two members shall be appointed for
a term to expire April 1 of the second year after appointment, and two
members shall be appointed for a term to expire on April 1 of the first year
after appointment. All terms shall thereafter expire on April 1 of the third
calendar year following appointment. A person appointed to fill an unexpired
term shall serve to the end of that term. At the creation of the Commission, the
appointments may only be denied by a majority vote of the Board of
Aldermen, and thereafter all appointments shall be made pursuant to this
charter.
(d) Annually the Board shall elect a Chair, Treasurer, and Clerk whose
names shall be certified to the City Clerk.
(c)(e) If any commissioner or employee of an Authority owns or controls
an interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or planned to be
included in any project, he or she the commissioner or employee immediately
shall disclose the same in writing to the Authority and such disclosure shall be
entered upon the minutes of the Authority, and that person will shall refrain
from any participation in that matter, but will shall not be precluded from
involvement in any other matters.
* * *
VT LEG #384192 v.1

No. M-5 Page 6 of 6
2025
Sec. 2a. REDESIGNATION
24 App. V.S.A. chapter 155E (Town of West Rutland) is redesignated as
24 App. V.S.A. chapter 162.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: June 5, 2025
VT LEG #384192 v.1